District of Columbia statutes.
24-231.14

Disposition of profits.

The Mayor is authorized to retain any accumulated profits from a prison industries program for the purpose of acquiring or improving personal property, or to increase working capital to planned operating levels in a prison industries program. The Mayor is also authorized to retain accumulated profits from a prison industries program for payments to inmates employed in a prison industries program as well as to other inmates.

May 8, 1996, D.C. Law 11-117, § 15, 43 DCR 1179
1981 Ed., § 24-458.14.